New Jersey, session 221, S2856.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Corrections shall report quarterly to the Senate President and the Speaker of the General Assembly in accordance with section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) on the operation of each residential community release program in this State. b.    The report required by subsection a. of this section shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   the total reimbursement provided; (2)   the rate of reimbursement received for each inmate; (3)   the number of inmates for which reimbursement was received; (4)   the number of inmates imprisoned for violent crimes and the total number of days the inmate was imprisoned; (5)   the number of inmates imprisoned for non-violent crimes and the total number of days the inmate was imprisoned; (6)   the total number of inmates imprisoned for violent crimes who escaped or absconded and the total number of inmates imprisoned for non-violent crimes who escaped or absconded; (7)   the actions taken to protect inmates imprisoned for non-violent crimes from inmates imprisoned for violent crimes; (8)   the number of documented incidents involving physical violence; (9)   the disciplinary actions taken against inmates accused of violent activity; and (10) the actions taken to prevent violent behavior from occurring. 2.    In addition to the reports required by section 3 of P.L.2009, c.329 (C.30:4-91.15), the Commissioner of Corrections shall analyze the effectiveness of each residential community release program in this State, with a particular emphasis on recidivism rates for each program.  The commissioner shall annually report to the Senate President and the Speaker of the General Assembly in accordance with section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) the results of this analysis and make recommendations on how to improve recidivism rates in each program. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.